Maine, session 132, LD1350.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §1015, sub-§2-A, as repealed by PL 2023, c. 244, §6, is
reenacted to read:
2-A. Contributions by business entities. A business entity may not make
contributions to a candidate.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §1015, sub-§2-D, as enacted by IB 2023, c. 4, §2, is amended
to read:
2-D. Contributions by political action committees and business entities to political
action committees making independent expenditures. A leadership political action
committee, a separate segregated fund committee, a caucus political action committee, any
other political action committee or any business entity may not make contributions
aggregating more than $5,000 in any calendar year to a political action committee for the
purpose of making independent expenditures under section 1019‑B, subsection 1.
Beginning December 1, 2024, contribution limits in accordance with this subsection are
adjusted every 2 years based on the Consumer Price Index as reported by the United States
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest amount
divisible by $25. The commission shall post the current contribution limit and the amount
of the next adjustment and the date that it will become effective on its publicly accessible
website and include this information with any publication to be used as a guide for
candidates. For purposes of this subsection, "business entity" includes a firm, partnership,
corporation, incorporated association, labor organization or other organization, whether
organized as a for‑profit or a nonprofit entity.
Sec. 3. 21-A MRSA §1015, sub-§10, as repealed by PL 2023, c. 244, §8, is
reenacted to read:
10. Business entity defined. For purposes of this section, "business entity" includes
a firm, partnership, corporation, incorporated association, labor organization or other
organization, whether organized as a for-profit or a nonprofit entity.